Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 10. Dissolution

§ 15-1-1001.
When authorized; vote required; transfer of assets.

If the population residing within the corporate limits of any city or town is thirty-five (35) persons or less according to an accurate census made in the manner specified in this article, three-fourths (3/4) of the members of the governing body or if there is no governing body, a majority of those persons living within the county in which the municipality is situated who were members of the last governing body, may resolve to dissolve its municipal corporate status. Those persons may give, transfer, convey or assign all or any part of the municipal corporate assets, including money, property and rights, titles and interests of any nature to the nearest city or town within the same county.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 112; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-112; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-1101

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-1002.
Census; when taken; affidavit.

In order to determine whether its resident corporate population is thirty-five (35) persons or less, the governing body or the persons of the last governing body shall cause an accurate census to be taken of the resident population of the city or town on some day not more than forty (40) days prior to the date of passage of the resolution to dissolve its municipal corporate status. The census shall name every head of a family residing within the municipality on that day and the number of persons then belonging to every family. The person or persons taking the census shall verify it by affidavit.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 113; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-113; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-1102

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-1003.
Disposition of assets; use by receiving city or town.

The city or town receiving the assets becomes the absolute and unconditional owner of that property. The receiving city or town shall deposit all money so received to its general fund and may make expenditures thereof for any lawful purpose. All other assets may be managed or disposed of in any manner provided by law.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 114; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-114; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-1103

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-1004.
Disposition of assets; resolution and statement; when filed; contents.

Any city or town disposing of all or any part of its assets, within sixty (60) days after the date of the first of such transfers, shall file a certified copy of its resolution of dissolution in the office of the secretary of state. The resolution shall be accompanied by a true and correct verified statement of the mayor, president of the council or clerk of the governing body, or of the chairman or mayor of the last governing body, setting forth the nature, description and extent of the assets, the date or dates on which transfers were made, the recipient of the assets, a certified copy of the census and all proper instruments of conveyance necessary to transfer any remaining assets to the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 115; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-115; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-1104; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-1005.
Certificate of dissolution; issuance and filing thereof; date of dissolution.

The secretary of state shall thereafter issue to the mayor, president of the council, or clerk or chairman of the former governing body a certificate of dissolution, together with a certified copy thereof which shall be filed in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the city or town was situated.

The municipal corporate status shall be dissolved upon the date the secretary of state issues a certificate of dissolution, if a certified copy of the certificate is filed in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the municipality was situated within ten (10) days after that date. Otherwise the date of dissolution is the date upon which the certified copy of the certificate of dissolution is filed in the proper county office.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 116, 117; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-116, 15.1-117; W.S. 1977, §§ 15-1-1105, 15-1-1106; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-1006.
Certificate of dissolution; presumption upon filing; escheat of assets.

If the certified copy of the certificate of dissolution is filed, it is presumed that the dispositions of all municipal corporate assets was made in substantial compliance with this article. All other assets belonging to the city or town not described in the statement or instrument of conveyance filed with the secretary of state shall escheat to the state in the manner and for the uses and purposes provided by law.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 118; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-118; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-1107; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.